District of Columbia statutes.
8-1779.03

Review period; time for filing state energy plans; approval.

Each state energy plan shall be submitted to the Council for a 60-day review period (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess) at least 90 days before the plan is required to be submitted to the federal agency administering the program. Proposed modifications to an approved state plan shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day review period (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess) at least 45 days before the modification is required to be submitted to the federal agency administering the program. The Council may, by resolution, approve or disapprove any plan or modification, in whole or in part, within the review period. If the Council, by resolution, does not approve or disapprove any plan or modification before the expiration of the review period, the plan or modification shall be deemed approved.

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-173, § 4, 33 DCR 7224
This section is referenced in § 2-913.
2001 Ed., § 2-913.
1981 Ed., § 1-1913.